Tennessee, session 114, HB1776.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-225(f), is amended by deleting
"February 1 thereafter" and substituting "January 15 thereafter".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1776
010765
- 1 -